Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.079

Department of transportation—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of transportation to the secretary, a deputy secretary, an administrative assistant to the secretary, if any, one assistant secretary for each division designated pursuant to RCW 47.01.081, one confidential secretary for each of the above-named officers, up to six transportation district administrators and one confidential secretary for each district administrator, up to six additional new administrators or confidential secretaries designated by the secretary of the department of transportation and approved by the Washington personnel resources board pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.06.070, the legislative liaison for the department, the state construction engineer, the state aid engineer, the personnel manager, the state project development engineer, the state maintenance and operations engineer, one confidential secretary for each of the last-named five positions, and a confidential secretary for the public affairs administrator. The individuals appointed under this section shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, and shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for individuals exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

[ 2002 c 354 s 239; 1993 c 281 s 23; 1985 c 178 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 13.]

NOTES:

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Exempt positions filled pending permanent appointment—1977 ex.s. c 151: "If on September 21, 1977, any exempt position designated hereinabove has not been filled by appointment, the person serving in the comparable exempt position, if any, in an agency whose functions are by *section 3 of this 1977 amendatory act transferred to the department of transportation shall fill such exempt position until a permanent appointment thereto has been made." [ 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 14.]

*Reviser's note: "section 3 of this 1977 amendatory act" is codified as RCW 47.01.031.

Federal requirements—1977 ex.s. c 151: See RCW 47.98.070.